Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.840

Definitions for purposes of RCW 28B.10.840 through 28B.10.844.

The term "institution of higher education" whenever used in RCW 28B.10.840 through 28B.10.844, shall be held and construed to mean any public institution of higher education in Washington. The term "educational board" whenever used in RCW 28B.10.840 through 28B.10.844, shall be held and construed to mean the state board for community and technical colleges.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 141; 1985 c 370 s 57; 1975 1st ex.s. c 132 s 17; 1972 ex.s. c 23 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 132: See notes following RCW 28B.77.060.